Utah statutes.
39-6-10.   Parties under obligation to keep a prisoner -- Reporting.

(1)  A provost marshal, commander of a guard, master at arms, warden, keeper, sheriff, or officer of a city or county jail or other jail designated under Section 39-6-9, may not refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his charge if the committing person provides a statement signed by him, indicating the offense charged against the prisoner.

(2)  Any party under Subsection (1) charged with keeping a prisoner shall within 24 hours after that commitment or as soon as he is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the nature of the offense charged against him, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.



Amended by Chapter 15, 1989 General Session

